Mississippi statutes. Title 61. Aviation
Chapter 3. Airport Authorities

§ 61-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Airport Authorities Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-52; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 22.

§ 61-3-3.
Definitions.

The following words or terms, whenever used or referred to in this chapter, shall have the following respective meanings unless different meanings clearly appear from the context:

“Airport” means any area of land or water which is used, or intended for use, for the landing and taking off of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas which are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or rights-of-way, or for other appropriate purposes, including buffer areas and areas for airport compatible development, together with all buildings and facilities located thereon.

“Airport-related contracts, leases and other arrangements” means any leases, contracts or other arrangements entered into by an authority in accordance with Section 61-3-21 other than any:

Unrelated contracts, leases and other arrangements, as defined in this section; and

Leases, contracts or other arrangements related primarily to buffer areas or other such areas for airport compatible development and any buildings or facilities located thereon.

“Airport authority” or “authority” means any airport authority created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

“Airport hazard” means any structure, object or natural growth, or use of land which obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport, or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off of aircraft.

“Air navigation facility” means any facility other than one owned and operated by the United States, used in, available for use in, or designed for use in aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities, or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe taking off, navigation and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or all of such facilities.

“Bonds” means any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures or similar obligations issued by an authority pursuant to this chapter.

“Governing body” means the official or officials authorized by law to exercise ordinance or other lawmaking powers of a municipality.

“Local government” means any local governmental unit as defined in Section 17-13-5.

“Municipal airport authority” or “municipal authority” means a municipal airport authority created pursuant to the provisions of Section 61-3-5 or 61-3-6.

“Municipality” means any county, supervisors district or supervisors districts, or all that portion of the county lying outside the territorial boundaries of any named city, town or village, and a city, town and village of this state or any state-supported institution of higher learning or any public community or junior college.

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint-stock association or body politic, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee or other similar representative thereof.

“Regional airport authority” or “regional authority” means a regional airport authority created pursuant to the provisions of Section 61-3-7.

“Unrelated contracts, leases and other arrangements” means any lease, contract or other arrangement entered into by the authority in accordance with Section 61-3-21 pursuant to which the current, primary use of the structures, improvements or other facilities erected, installed, constructed or located in connection therewith are substantially unrelated to the support of the following airport-related activities:

The taking off and landing of commercial and private aircraft at the airport or air navigation facility;

The maintenance or repair of commercial or private aircraft taking off and landing at the airport or air navigation facility;

The storage, via hanger or otherwise, of commercial or private aircraft taking off and landing at the airport or air navigation facility;

The shipping or transporting of freight by aircraft at the airport or air navigation facility;

The provision of ground and air transportation services to commercial or private aircraft passengers;

The supplying of goods, commodities, things, services or facilities primarily:

1. To commercial and private aircraft taking off and landing at the airport or air navigation facility; or

2. Within the airport terminal building to commercial or private aircraft passengers in the process of traveling on such aircraft.

Any fixed base operator activities providing aviation services at the airport or air navigation facility.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-31; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 379, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 309, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 456, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 302, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2019).

§ 61-3-5.
Creation of municipal airport authority; applicability.

Any municipality or a state-supported institution of higher learning or a public community or junior college, by resolution, may create a public body, corporate and politic, to be known as a municipal airport authority, which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the appointment and qualification of the first commissioners thereof. Upon the adoption of a resolution creating a municipal airport authority, the governing body of the municipality or of the state-supported institution of higher learning or other public community or junior college, pursuant to the resolution, shall appoint five (5) persons as commissioners of the authority. The commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years, respectively. Thereafter, each commissioner shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years, except that vacancies occurring otherwise than by the expiration of term shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments. This section shall not apply to the airport authority created in Section 61-3-6.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-32; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 309, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 456, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 61-3-6.
Creation of Jackson Metropolitan Area Airport Authority.

The Jackson Metropolitan Area Airport Authority is created and established and full power is vested in the authority to manage, control and enforce all necessary and beneficial matters pertaining to the operation of Jackson-Medgar Wiley Evers International Airport and Hawkins Field Airport. The authority shall have the same powers and duties as a municipal airport authority under this chapter and any other laws pertaining to municipal airport authorities except in respect to the sale or disposal of real property prohibited under subsection (5)(a) of this section.

The Jackson Metropolitan Area Airport Authority shall consist of the following nine (9) commissioners:

The Adjutant General of the Mississippi National Guard, or his designee;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority, or his designee;

One (1) commissioner appointed by the Mayor of the City of Jackson appointed for an initial term of one (1) year;

One (1) commissioner appointed by the City Council of the City of Jackson appointed for an initial term of two (2) years;

One (1) commissioner appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Madison County appointed for an initial term of three (3) years;

One (1) commissioner appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Rankin County appointed for an initial term of four (4) years;

Two (2) commissioners appointed by the Governor from the City of Jackson appointed for terms of (5) years one of whom shall be the holder of a valid pilot’s license or certification issued by the Federal Aviation Administration; and

One (1) commissioner appointed by the Lieutenant Governor from the City of Jackson appointed for a term of five (5) years.

Unless otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, commissioners appointed under paragraphs (c) through (h) of subsection (2) of this section shall be persons with at least ten (10) years’ experience as a certified public accountant or charter financial analyst, business owners with at least ten (10) years’ experience in executive management, persons with at least ten (10) years’ experience in the aviation industry, persons with at least ten (10) years’ experience in economic development, attorneys with at least ten (10) years’ experience in commercial law, construction law or aviation law, persons who have been holders of a pilot’s license or certification issued by the Federal Aviation Administration for at least ten (10) years, persons with at least ten (10) years’ experience in dealing with public financing transactions, or persons holding certificates of registration as a professional engineer with at least ten (10) years’ experience in the practice of engineering.

After the initial terms, commissioners shall be appointed in the same manner as the original appointment for terms of five (5) years or until their successor is appointed and qualified. Vacancies occurring other than the expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

Upon review and approval by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) of the Jackson Metropolitan Area Airport Authority as an eligible airport sponsor and the FAA’s review and approval of the issuance of an airport operating certificate under 14 CFR part 139 with respect to the Jackson-Medgar Wiley Evers International Airport, the Jackson Municipal Airport Authority is abolished, and all powers and duties, airport equipment, buildings, facilities, inventories, records, personnel, resources and all other property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, including any pertaining to or generated from revenues of the airport, are transferred to the Jackson Metropolitan Area Airport Authority. The Jackson Metropolitan Area Airport Authority may not, by sale or otherwise, dispose of any real property acquired by transfer in accordance with this paragraph (a) or subsequently acquired by the authority.

Upon the transfer required by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Jackson Metropolitan Area Airport Authority shall assume all obligations of the Jackson Municipal Airport Authority pertaining to the airport that are in effect at the time of the transfer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 456, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 61-3-7.
Creation of regional airport authority; sharing a commissioner on the authority.

Two (2) or more municipalities or two (2) or more municipalities and any state-supported institution of higher learning or a public community or junior college, by resolution of each, may create a public body, corporate and politic, to be known as a regional airport authority which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the issuance by the Secretary of State of a certificate of incorporation. The governing body of each municipality, the institution of higher learning or the public community or junior college, pursuant to its resolution, shall appoint one (1) person as a commissioner of the authority. However, if the regional airport authority consists of an even number of participants, which include two (2) or more municipalities or two (2) or more municipalities and a state institution of higher learning or a public community or junior college, an additional commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor. Such additional commissioner shall be a resident of a county other than the counties of the participating municipalities but contiguous to at least one (1) of such counties.

A regional airport authority may be increased from time to time to serve one or more additional municipalities if each additional municipality and each of the municipalities and the institution of higher learning or the public community or junior college then included in the regional authority and the commissioners of the regional authority, respectively, adopt a resolution consenting thereto. If a municipal airport authority for any municipality seeking to be included in the regional authority is then in existence, the commissioners of the municipal authority shall consent to the inclusion of the municipality, institution of higher learning or the public community or junior college in the regional authority, and if the municipal authority has any bonds outstanding, unless the holders of fifty-one percent (51%) or more in amount of the bonds consent, in writing, to the inclusion of the municipality in the regional authority, no such inclusion shall be effected. Upon the inclusion of any municipality, institution of higher learning or the public community or junior college in the regional authority, all rights, contracts, obligations and property, real and personal, of the municipal authority shall be in the name of and vest in the regional authority.

A regional airport authority may be decreased if each of the municipalities and the institution of higher learning or the public community or junior college then included in the regional authority and the commissioners of the regional authority consent to the decrease and make provision for the retention or disposition of its assets and liabilities. However, if the regional authority has any bonds outstanding, no decrease shall be effected unless seventy-five percent (75%) or more of the holders of the bonds consent thereto in writing.

If a municipality so elects, it may share its commissioner position with another municipality that is not then a participant in the regional authority. In order to do so, the initiating and participating municipalities, and the joining municipality, all other municipalities participating at that time, and the commissioners of the regional authority, must adopt resolutions consenting to the sharing of the position. The initiating municipality and the joining municipality must reach an agreement to jointly determine the method for the appointment of their joint commissioner. Upon the adoption of the resolutions of authorization and the execution of the agreement between the participating and joining municipalities, the joint commissioner shall have the same powers, authority, duties and obligations otherwise vested in commissioners of the regional authority.

A municipality, institution of higher learning or public community or junior college shall not adopt any resolution authorized by this section without a public hearing thereon. Notice thereof shall be given at least ten (10) days before the hearing in a newspaper published in the municipality, in the institution of higher learning or in the public community or junior college, or if there is no newspaper published therein, then in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality, in the institution of higher learning or in the public community or junior college.

At the expiration of the term of all commissioners serving as of January 1, 1978, the airport authority shall effect staggered terms by the drawing of lots and reporting thereon to appointing authorities. The commissioners shall be designated to serve for terms of one (1) year, two (2) years, three (3) years, four (4) years and so forth depending upon the number of participating appointing authorities. Thereafter, each commissioner shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years except that vacancies occurring otherwise than by expiration of terms shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-33; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 309, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 448, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2011.).

§ 61-3-8.
Government of regional airport authority located within two or more judicial districts.

A regional airport authority located outside of municipal boundaries and that is within two (2) or more judicial districts may, in its discretion, adopt a resolution declaring which judicial district shall govern the regional airport authority. Upon adoption of the resolution, the regional airport authority shall be governed by all laws, regulations, rules and ordinances applicable to the judicial district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 464, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1992).

§ 61-3-9.
Certificate of incorporation of regional airport authority.

Upon the appointment and qualification of the commissioners first appointed to a regional airport authority, they shall submit to the secretary of state a certified copy of each resolution adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of Section 61-3-7 by the municipalities included in the regional authority. Upon receipt thereof, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of incorporation to the regional airport authority.

When a regional airport authority is increased or decreased pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of Section 61-3-7, it shall forward to the secretary of state a certified copy of each resolution adopted pursuant thereto and, upon receipt thereof, the secretary of state shall issue an amended certificate of incorporation in accordance therewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-34; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 4.

§ 61-3-11.
Proof of existence and authority of airport authority.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of a municipal airport authority, created pursuant to Section 61-3-5, the municipal authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact its business and exercise its powers upon proof of the adoption by the municipality of the resolution creating the municipal airport authority and of the appointment and qualification of the first commissioners thereof. Duly certified copies of the resolution creating the authority and of the certificates of appointment of the commissioners shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of a regional airport authority, such regional airport authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact its business and exercise its powers upon proof of the issuance by the secretary of state of a certificate of incorporation of such regional airport authority. A copy of such certificate of incorporation, duly certified by the secretary of state, shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-35; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 5.

§ 61-3-13.
Compensation of commissioners; meetings of authority; voting; officers.

Each commissioner of a regional or municipal airport authority may receive from that airport authority per diem compensation in the amount provided by Section 25-3-69 for each day or fraction of a day engaged in attendance of meetings of the authority or engaged in other official duties of the authority, not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days in any one (1) year, and may receive from the airport authority actual traveling expenses incurred in the discharge of his duties. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. The certificates of the appointment and reappointment of commissioners shall be filed with the authority.

The powers of each authority shall be vested in the commissioners of that authority. A majority of the commissioners of an authority shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting the business of the authority and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the authority upon a vote of not less than a majority of the commissioners present. There shall be elected a chairman and vice chairman from among the commissioners.

The commissioners of an authority shall designate an executive director, who shall be the chief executive officer of the authority and shall perform those duties as are required by law and any other duties as may be assigned by the commissioners. The commissioners may designate the executive director as the purchasing agent of the authority. If so designated, the executive director shall have the authority of the purchasing agent of a state agency under Section 31-7-13.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-36; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 6; Laws, 1978, ch. 396, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 384, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 433, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 450, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2012.).

§ 61-3-15.
General powers of authority.

An authority shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter (excluding the power to levy and collect taxes or special assessments) including, but not limited to, the power:

To sue and be sued, to have a seal and to have perpetual succession.

To purchase general liability insurance coverage, including errors and omissions insurance, for its officials and employees.

To employ an executive director, secretary, technical experts, and such other officers, agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and to determine their qualifications and duties, and to establish compensation and other employment benefits as may be advisable to attract and retain proficient personnel.

To execute such contracts and other instruments and take such other action as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

To plan, establish, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate and protect airports and air navigation facilities within this state and within any adjoining state, including the acquisition, lease, lease-purchase, construction, installation, equipment, maintenance and operation of such airports or buildings, equipment and other facilities or other property for the servicing of aircraft or for the comfort and accommodation of air travelers or for any other purpose deemed by the authority to be necessary to carry out its duties; to develop, operate, manage or own and maintain intermodal facilities to serve air and surface cargo and multimodal facilities to serve highway and rail passenger transportation needs to ensure interface and interaction between modes for cargo and passengers; to construct, improve, and maintain means of ingress and egress to airport properties from and over off-airport sites with approval of the city or county in which the off-airport site is located; to market, promote and advertise airport properties, goods and services; and to directly purchase and sell supplies, goods and commodities incident to the operation of its airport properties without having to make purchases thereof through the municipal governing authorities, and with the authority to utilize dual-phase design-build and construction manager at-risk methods of construction in accordance with Sections 31-7-13.1 and 31-7-13.2. For all the previously stated purposes, an authority may, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, acquire property, real or personal, or any interest therein, including easements in airport hazards or land outside the boundaries of an airport or airport site, as are necessary to permit the removal, elimination, obstruction-marking or obstruction-lighting of airport hazards, to prevent the establishment of airport hazards or to carry out its duties.

To acquire, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, lease-purchase, eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, existing airports and air navigation facilities. However, an authority shall not acquire or take over any airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by another authority, a municipality or public agency of this or any other state without the consent of such authority, municipality or public agency.

To establish or acquire and maintain airports in, over and upon any public waters of this state, and any submerged lands under such public waters, and to construct and maintain terminal buildings, landing floats, causeways, roadways and bridges for approaches to or connecting with any such airport, and landing floats and breakwaters for the protection thereof.

To establish, enact and enforce ordinances, rules, regulations and standards for public safety, aviation safety, airport operations and the preservation of good order and peace of the authority; to prevent injury to, destruction of or interference with public or private property; to protect property, health and lives and to enhance the general welfare of the authority by restricting the movements of citizens or any group thereof on the property of the authority when there is imminent danger to the public safety because of freedom of movement thereof; to regulate the entrances to property and buildings of the authority and the way of ingress and egress to and from the same; to establish fire limits and to hire firemen, including aircraft fire and rescue and similar personnel, and to establish and equip a fire department to provide fire and other emergency services on any property of the authority; to regulate, restrain or prohibit construction failing to meet standards established by the authority; to appoint and discharge police officers with jurisdiction limited to property of the airport authority and authorization to enforce the ordinances, rules and regulations of the authority, as well as the laws of the State of Mississippi, and to issue citations for infractions of all of such ordinances, rules, regulations, standards and laws of the State of Mississippi returnable to the court of appropriate jurisdiction.

To develop and operate an industrial park or parks and exercise all authority provided for under Chapter 7, Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972.

To attach, pursuant to the power and procedure set forth in Chapter 33, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, the equipment of debtors of the authority.

To enter into agreements with local governments pursuant to Section 17-13-1 et seq.

To render emergency assistance to other airports within the United States at an aggregate cost of less than Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) per emergency. The assistance authorized in this paragraph must be rendered within ninety (90) days after a state of emergency has been declared by the federal government, or by the local or state government that has jurisdiction over the area where the airport needing assistance is located.

(m ) To enter into joint use or similar agreements with any department or agency of the United States of America or the State of Mississippi, including any military department of the United States of America or the State of Mississippi, with respect to the use and operation of, or services provided at, any airport or other property of the authority on the terms and conditions as the authority may deem appropriate, including provisions limiting the liability of the United States of America or the State of Mississippi for loss or damage to the authority if the authority determines that the limitation of liability is reasonable, necessary and appropriate under the circumstances.

To enter into mutual aid agreements with counties and municipalities for reciprocal emergency aid and assistance in case of emergencies too extensive to be dealt with unassisted; to participate in the Statewide Mutual Aid Compact (SMAC) in accordance with Section 33-15-19.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-37; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 7; Laws, 1978, ch. 396, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 441; Laws, 1980, ch. 410, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 30; Laws, 1985, ch. 447, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 29; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 42; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 43; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 40; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 38; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 39; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 39; Laws, 1992, ch. 379, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 41; Laws, 1994, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 580, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 419, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 450, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2012.).

§ 61-3-17.
Exercise of power of eminent domain.

In the acquisition of property by eminent domain proceedings authorized by this chapter, an authority shall proceed in the manner provided by Chapter 27 of Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, and as elsewhere provided by law. For the purpose of making surveys and examinations relative to eminent domain proceedings, it shall be lawful for the authority to enter upon the land, doing no unnecessary damage. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute or other law, an authority may take possession of any property to be acquired by eminent domain proceedings at any time after the commencement of such proceedings upon a specific finding by the authority of the public necessity for the immediate acquisition of the property pursuant to Sections 11-27-81 et seq., and compliance with all the provisions of Sections 11-27-81 et seq., including the provisions for making a deposit. The authority shall not be precluded from abandoning such proceedings at any time prior to final order and decree of the court having jurisdiction of such proceedings. The authority shall be liable to the owner of the property for any damage done to the property during possession thereof by the authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-38; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 8; Laws, 1996, ch. 404, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 61-3-19.
Disposal of airport property.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement authorized by Section 61-3-25, an authority may, by sale, lease or otherwise, dispose of any airport, air navigation facility or other property, real or personal, or portion thereof or interest therein, acquired pursuant to this chapter. If Section 29-1-1 is applicable to a sale of real property, the sale shall comply with Section 29-1-1.

If Section 29-1-1 is not applicable, the disposal by sale, lease or otherwise, shall be in accordance with the following procedure. The authority shall find and determine by resolution duly and lawfully adopted and spread upon its minutes that:

The property is no longer needed for authority purposes and is not to be used in the authority’s operation;

There is no state agency, board, commission or any governing authority within the state that has expressed a need or use for the property and the federal government has not expressed a need or use for the property; and

The use of the property for the purpose for which it is to be sold, leased or otherwise disposed of will promote and foster the development and improvement of the authority or of the community in which it is located and the civic, social, educational, cultural, moral, economic or industrial welfare thereof.

After making the determinations, the authority may sell, lease or otherwise dispose of the property in accordance with applicable law and by any of the following methods:

The authority may sell, lease or otherwise dispose of the property if the consideration is not less than the fair market price for the property as determined by averaging the appraisals of two (2) professional property appraisers selected by the authority and approved by the purchaser or lessee. Appraisal fees shall be shared equally by the authority and the purchaser or lessee.

The authority may sell, lease or otherwise dispose of the property to the highest bidder after publishing at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a public newspaper published in the county in which the property is located, or if no newspaper is published in the county, then in a newspaper having general circulation therein, the authority’s intention to lease, sell or otherwise dispose of the property and to accept sealed competitive bids for the sale, lease or disposal of the property. The authority shall thereafter accept bids for the sale, lease or disposal of the property and shall award the sale, lease or disposal to the highest bidder.

The authority may sell and dispose of personal property at public sale for cash to the highest bidder after publishing at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a public newspaper published in the county in which the property is located, or if no newspaper is published in the county, then in a newspaper having general circulation therein, the authority’s intention to sell and dispose of the personal property at public sale for cash. Any public sale for cash may be conducted by or on behalf of the authority. At the public sale for cash, the personal property shall be sold and disposed of to the highest bidder.

The authority may sell and dispose of personal property by use of an Internet web service available to the public, including, but not limited to, an Internet auction website, for cash or irrevocable electronic transfer of funds, to the highest bidder after publishing at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a public newspaper published in the county in which the property is located, or if no newspaper is published in the county, then in a newspaper having general circulation therein, the following information:

The authority’s intention to sell and dispose of the personal property through use of the Internet web service;

The location on the Internet website where the personal property will be listed; and

The listing date and closing date of the Internet sale.

At the Internet sale, the personal property shall be sold and disposed of to the highest bidder; provided, all Internet sales shall comply with federal law. In the event that any Internet sale is not concluded for any reason, the authority may relist and sell the personal property by use of the same Internet web service without the public notice set forth in this paragraph.

Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, in the case of a sale, lease or disposal of property to another authority, a municipality or an agency of the state or federal government for use and operation as a public airport, the sale, lease or other disposal thereof may be effected in such manner and upon such terms as the commissioners of the authority may deem to be in the best interest of civil aviation.

The authority may lease lands owned by the authority for oil, gas and mineral exploration and development upon the terms and conditions and for consideration as the authority shall deem proper and advisable.However, no oil, gas or mineral lease shall be for a primary term of more than ten (10) years and the lease or leases shall provide for annual rentals of not less than One Dollar ($1.00) per acre and shall provide for royalties of not less than three-sixteenths (3/16) of all oil, gas and other minerals produced, including sulphur. All rentals, royalties or other revenue payable under any lease executed under this section shall be paid to and collected by the authority.The leases shall specifically provide that, in no event, shall any such lease or the exercise of any rights thereunder, interfere with the use of any airport or air navigational facilities for their intended purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-39; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 370; Laws, 1992, ch. 379, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 14; Laws, 1996, ch. 404, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 450, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 523, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 61-3-21.
Operation and use privileges; exemption from taxation.

In connection with the operation of an airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by an authority, the authority may enter into contracts, leases and other arrangements for terms not to exceed fifty (50) years with any persons:

Granting the privilege of using or improving the airport or air navigation facility or any portion or facility thereof or space therein for commercial purposes;

Conferring the privilege of supplying goods, commodities, things, services or facilities at the airport or air navigation facility; and

Making available services to be furnished by the authority or its agents at the airport or air navigation facility.

In each case the authority may establish the terms and conditions and fix the charges, rentals or fees for the privileges or services, which shall be reasonable and uniform for the same class of privilege or service and which shall be established with due regard to the property and improvements used and the expenses of operation to the authority. In no case shall the public be deprived of its rightful, equal and uniform use of the airport, air navigation facility or portion or facility thereof.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement authorized by Section 61-3-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, an authority may, by contract, lease or other arrangements, upon a consideration fixed by it, grant to any qualified person for a term not to exceed fifty (50) years, the privilege of operating, as agent of the authority or otherwise, any airport owned or controlled by the authority. However, no person shall be granted any authority to operate an airport other than as a public airport or to enter into any contracts, leases or other arrangements in connection with the operation of the airport which the authority might not have undertaken under subsection (1) of this section.

All airport-related contracts, leases and other arrangements entered into pursuant to this section are deemed to serve a public and governmental purpose as a matter of public necessity; therefore, all airport-related contracts, leases, and other arrangements and all structures, improvements and other facilities erected, installed, constructed or located in connection therewith on an airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by an authority, or any portion of facility thereof or space therein, shall be free and exempt from all state, county and municipal ad valorem taxes on real property and personal property for so long as may otherwise be lawful, and the charges, rentals and fees received by an authority in connection with airport-related contracts, leases and other arrangements shall be deemed to be in lieu of said taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-41; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 11; Laws, 1992, ch. 464, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 540, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2008); Laws, 2019, ch. 302, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2019).

§ 61-3-23.
Promulgation, repeal, etc., of resolutions, rules, regulations, orders and standards.

An authority is authorized to adopt, amend, and repeal such reasonable resolutions, rules, regulations, and orders as it shall deem necessary for the management, government, and use of any airport or air navigation facility owned by it or under its control. No rule, regulation, order, or standard prescribed by the commission shall be inconsistent with, or contrary to, this chapter, or any act of the congress of the United States or any regulation promulgated or standard established pursuant thereto. The authority shall keep on file at the principal office of the authority for public inspection a copy of all its rules and regulations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-42; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 12.